North Carolina, session 2025, SB285.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Use of Funds. – For each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium,
except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, the State Board of Education shall allocate
funds pursuant to this section to eligible local school administrative units to provide salary
supplements to teachers and qualifying school administrators in those units. Allocation of salary
supplements among teachers and qualifying school administrators within each eligible local
school administrative unit, including whether a teacher or qualifying school administrator
receives a salary supplement and the amount of the supplement provided to that person, shall be
determined in the discretion of the local board of education of the eligible unit, except that no
individual salary supplement shall exceed the per teacher funding amount awarded to that unit
pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions shall
apply:
(1) Adjusted market value of taxable real property. – A county's assessed taxable
real property value, using the latest available data published by the
Department of Revenue, divided by the county's sales assessment ratio
determined under G.S. 105-289(h).
(2) Composite value. – For each eligible county, the sum of the following:
a. The taxable real property factor multiplied by sixty-five percent
(65%).
b. The median household income factor multiplied by twenty-five
percent (25%).
c. The effective tax rate factor multiplied by ten percent (10%).
(3) County allocation factor. – For each eligible county, the supplement factor for
that county divided by the sum of all supplement factors for the State.
(4) Effective tax rate. – The actual county tax rate multiplied by the most recent
annual sales assessment ratio for that county.
(5) Effective tax rate factor. – For each eligible county, the effective tax rate for
that county divided by the median effective tax rate in the State.
(6) Eligible county. – One of the following:
a. A county that has an adjusted market value of taxable real property of
less than fifty billion nine hundred million dollars ($50,900,000,000).
*S285-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Guilford County.
(7) Eligible local school administrative unit. – A local school administrative unit
located in whole or in part in an eligible county.
(8) Eligible school. – A public school that is located in an eligible county and
governed by a local school administrative unit.
(9) Maintenance of effort amount. – For each local school administrative unit in
each fiscal year, the supplant factor multiplied by the total State and non-State
funds expended for salaries for teachers from the fiscal year for which the
most recent salary data are available.
(10) Median household income. – A county's median household income for the
most recent 12 months for which data are available, as that term is used in
G.S. 143B-437.08.
(11) Median household income factor. – For each eligible county, the median
household income in the State divided by the median household income for
that county.
(12) Non-State funds. – Any funds held by a local school administrative unit, other
than nonrecurring federal funds received as a result of legislation enacted by
Congress in response to COVID-19, that are not State funds.
(13) Qualifying school administrator. – Any of the following:
a. Assistant principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8).
b. Principals paid pursuant to G.S. 115C-285(a)(8a).
(14) Supplant factor. – For each local school administrative unit in each fiscal year
of the fiscal biennium, the total non-State funds expended for salary
supplements for teachers in the 2020-2021 fiscal year divided by the total
State and non-State funds expended for salaries for teachers in the 2020-2021
fiscal year.
(15) Supplement factor. – For each eligible county, the composite value multiplied
by the number of State-funded teachers employed in a school in the county
that is governed by a local school administrative unit.
(16) Taxable real property factor. – For each eligible county, the median adjusted
market value of taxable real property in the State divided by the adjusted
market value of taxable real property for that county.
(17) Teacher. – Teachers and instructional support personnel.
SECTION 1.(c) Allocation of Funds. – The State Board of Education shall allocate
funds for salary supplements to eligible local school administrative units according to the
following procedure:
(1) County allocation. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall determine
a county allocation by multiplying the county allocation factor for that county
by the funding amount appropriated pursuant to this section for the applicable
fiscal year.
(2) Per teacher funding amount. – For each eligible county, the State Board shall
determine a per teacher funding amount by dividing the county allocation
amounts determined pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection by the total
number of State-funded teachers employed in all eligible schools in that
county.
(3) Unit funding amount. – For each eligible local school administrative unit, the
State Board shall determine the funding amount for that unit based on the per
teacher funding amount or amounts for the eligible county or counties where
the unit is located. For each county with an eligible school governed by the
unit, the State Board shall multiply the applicable per teacher funding amount
for that county determined pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection by
Page 2 Senate Bill 285-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the number of State-funded teachers employed in the eligible school in that
county. If the unit is located in multiple eligible counties, the State Board shall
aggregate those amounts.
(4) Allocation and funding cap. – The State Board shall allocate the amount
determined pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection to each eligible local
school administrative unit for each applicable fiscal year, up to a maximum of
five thousand dollars ($5,000) per State-funded teacher.
SECTION 1.(d) Charter Schools. – Funds appropriated to the Department of Public
Instruction pursuant to this section shall be subject to the allocation of funds for charter schools
described in G.S. 115C-218.105. The General Assembly encourages charter schools receiving
funds pursuant to this section to provide salary supplements to teachers and qualifying school
administrators in the charter school in accordance with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 1.(e) Formula for Distribution of Supplemental Funding Pursuant to this
Section Only. – The formula in this section is solely a basis for distribution of supplemental
funding to eligible local school administrative units and is not intended to reflect any measure of
the adequacy of the educational program or funding for public schools. The formula is also not
intended to reflect any commitment by the General Assembly to appropriate any additional
supplemental funds for eligible local school administrative units.
SECTION 1.(f) Nonsupplant Requirement. – A local school administrative unit that
receives funds under this section shall use those funds to supplement non-State funds provided
for salary supplements for teachers and qualifying school administrators and shall not use any
State funds, including funds received under this section, Section 7A.4 of S.L. 2023-134, or
Section 7A.12 of S.L. 2021-180, to supplant non-State funds provided for salary supplements for
teachers and qualifying school administrators. For purposes of this section, a local school
administrative unit has supplanted non-State funds if the State Board finds that the amount of
non-State funds expended by the unit for salary supplements was less than ninety-five percent
(95%) of the maintenance of effort amount for the local school administrative unit.
SECTION 1.(g) Nonsupplant Enforcement. – The State Board of Education shall
not allocate any funds under this section to a local school administrative unit if it determines that
the unit has supplanted non-State funds in violation of subsection (f) of this section.
SECTION 1.(h) Reports. – No later than April 15 of each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium, the State Board of Education shall report the following information for the
applicable fiscal year to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division:
(1) A list of all eligible counties and eligible local school administrative units.
(2) Funds allocated to each eligible local school administrative unit.
(3) The percentage and amount of teachers and qualifying school administrators
in each eligible local school administrative unit receiving salary supplements.
(4) The average salary supplement amount in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(5) The range of salary supplement amounts in each eligible local school
administrative unit.
(6) The effect of the salary supplements on the retention of teachers and
qualifying school administrators in eligible local school administrative units.
(7) The identity of any local school administrative unit that the State Board
determines has supplanted funds.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 285-First Edition Page 3